Utah statutes.
67-4-15.   Insurance protection for funds, warrants and securities.
The state treasurer shall procure such insurance protecting the funds,
warrants and securities in his custody against loss from such causes and in
such amounts as the Commission of Finance may from time to time determine. The
cost of such insurance shall be paid out of the fund for the protection of
which it is carried.
